District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.12

District pledges.

The District pledges to the Authority that the District will not limit or alter rights vested in the Authority to fulfill agreements made with holders of the bonds, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders of the bonds until the bonds, together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceedings by or on behalf of the holders of the bonds are fully met and discharged. The Authority is authorized to include this pledge of the District in any agreement with the holders of the bonds.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 212, 41 DCR 5333
1981 Ed., § 9-813.